Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1324
Sell, distribute, circulate, offer for sale, or possess phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, or sounds transferred; unlawful; exception.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or association to sell, distribute, circulate, offer for sale, distribution, or circulation, or possess for the purpose of sale, distribution, or circulation any phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, or other article on which sounds have been transferred unless such phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, or other article bears the actual name and address of the transferor of the sounds in a prominent place on its outside face or package.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 308;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 186.